Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,113.06
Handicapped or disabled persons;
parking permit; use; display; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

A
handicapped or disabled parking permit shall not be transferable and shall
be used only by the party to whom issued or for the motor vehicle for which
issued and only for the purpose for which the permit is issued. A handicapped
or disabled parking permit shall be displayed by hanging the permit from the
motor vehicle's rearview mirror so as to be clearly visible through the front
windshield. A handicapped or disabled parking permit shall be displayed on
the dashboard only when there is no rearview mirror. No person shall alter
or reproduce in any manner a handicapped or disabled parking permit. No person
shall knowingly hold more than the allowed number of handicapped or disabled
parking permits. No person shall display a handicapped or disabled parking
permit issued under section 60-3,113.02 and park in a space or access aisle
designated for the exclusive use of a handicapped or disabled person unless
the holder of the permit will enter or exit the motor vehicle while it is
parked in a designated space or access aisle. No person shall display a handicapped
or disabled parking permit issued under section 60-3,113.03 and park in a
space or access aisle designated for the exclusive use of a handicapped or
disabled person unless the person displaying the permit is driving the motor
vehicle for which the permit was issued and a handicapped or disabled person
will enter or exit the motor vehicle while it is parked in a designated space
or access aisle. Any violation of this section shall constitute a
handicapped parking infraction as defined in section 18-1741.01 and shall
be subject to the penalties and procedures set forth in sections 18-1741.01
to 18-1741.07.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 28;

Laws 2014, LB657, § 10.